New Mexico, session 2026, SB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. A new section of the Medical Practice Act is
enacted to read:
"[NEW MATERIAL] ADVERTISING AND COMPETITIVE BIDDING.--
A. The board shall not restrict the ability of a
licensee to advertise the licensee's services except to
.233969.1

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
prohibit false, misleading or deceptive practices by the
licensee.
B. Rules promulgated by the board to prohibit
false, misleading or deceptive practices by a licensee shall
not restrict the:
(1) use of any advertising medium;
(2) licensee's personal appearance or the use
of the licensee's voice in an advertisement;
(3) size or duration of an advertisement by
the licensee; or
(4) licensee's advertisement under a trade
name."
SECTION 2. A new section of the Medical Practice Act is
enacted to read:
"[NEW MATERIAL] INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED TO
LICENSEES.--Each time a licensee obtains or renews a license,
the board shall provide the licensee with information on:
A. best practices for prescribing and dispensing
pain medications;
B. the risks and signs of substance use disorder
for persons who are prescribed prescription pain medications;
C. best practices for responding to an overdose of
prescription pain medications; and
D. how to contact poison control resources in
emergency situations."

.233969.1
- 2 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
SECTION 3. A new section of the Medical Practice Act is
enacted to read:
"[NEW MATERIAL] INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE PROVIDED TO THE
PUBLIC.--The board shall maintain a profile for each licensee
that is accessible on the board's website and includes:
A. the licensee's completed levels of education;
B. any specialty certification held by the
licensee;
C. the number of years the licensee has been
licensed in:
(1) the United States and Canada; and
(2) this state;
D. the name of any hospital in the state in which
the licensee has privileges;
E. the licensee's primary practice location;
F. a complete description of any disciplinary
history against the licensee by the board or a licensing board
in another jurisdiction;
G. a description of any formal complaint made
against the licensee and the status of the complaint; and
H. a description of any medical malpractice claim
against the licensee for which the licensee was found liable, a
jury awarded monetary damages to the claimant and the award has

been determined to be final and not subject to further appeal."

SECTION 4. Section 61-6-15 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1969,

.233969.1
- 3 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
Chapter 46, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read:
"61-6-15. LICENSE MAY BE REFUSED, REVOKED OR SUSPENDED--
LICENSEE MAY BE FINED, CENSURED OR REPRIMANDED--PROCEDURE--
PRACTICE AFTER SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION--PENALTY--
UNPROFESSIONAL AND DISHONORABLE CONDUCT DEFINED--FEES AND
EXPENSES.--
A. The board may refuse to license and may revoke
or suspend a license that has been issued by the board or a
previous board and may fine, censure or reprimand a licensee
upon satisfactory proof being made to the board that the
applicant for or holder of the license has been guilty of
unprofessional or dishonorable conduct. The board may also
refuse to license an applicant who is unable to practice as a
physician, practice as a physician assistant, an
anesthesiologist assistant, a genetic counselor, a naturopathic
practitioner, a naprapathic practitioner or a podiatric
physician or practice polysomnography, pursuant to Section
61-7-3 NMSA 1978. All proceedings shall be as required by the
Uniform Licensing Act or the Impaired Health Care Provider Act.
B. The board shall establish requirements for
licensees to provide information to members of the public on
how to contact the board to submit complaints of unprofessional
or dishonorable conduct against a licensee. Licensees may be

required to provide information on how to contact the board:

(1) on each registration form, application or

.233969.1
- 4 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
written contract for services from a licensee;
(2) on a sign prominently displayed in the
place of business of each licensee; or
(3) in a bill for service provided by a
licensee.
C. The board shall establish a standard form that
allows members of the public to submit complaints of
unprofessional or dishonorable conduct against a licensee. The
form shall be consumer friendly and posted conspicuously on the
board's website.
D. The board shall promulgate rules to establish
procedures for the investigation and review of complaints filed
with the board. The rules shall:
(1) distinguish among categories of complaints
and give priority to complaints that involve sexual misconduct,
quality of care and impaired physician issues;
(2) ensure that a complaint is not dismissed
without appropriate consideration;
(3) require the board to notify a licensee who
is the subject of a complaint filed with the board that a
complaint has been filed and to notify the licensee of the

nature of the complaint unless the notice would jeopardize an 22
investigation;

(4) require the board to notify the parties to

the complaint of the status of the complaint until final

.233969.1
- 5 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
disposition unless the notice would jeopardize an
investigation;
(5) require that the board be advised of the
dismissal of a complaint and that a letter be sent to the
person who filed the complaint and to the licensee who was the
subject of the complaint explaining the action taken on the
complaint; and
(6) ensure that a person who files a complaint
has an opportunity to explain the allegations made in the
complaint.
E. The board shall not consider or act on a
complaint involving care provided more than seven years before
the date on which the complaint is received by the board unless
the care was provided to a minor. If the care was provided to
a minor, the board shall not consider or act on a complaint
involving the care after the later of:
(1) the date the minor is twenty-one years of
age; or
(2) the seventh anniversary of the date of the
care.
F. On receipt of a complaint, the board may
consider a previously investigated complaint to determine
whether there is a pattern of unprofessional or dishonorable

conduct.

[B.] G. The board may, in its discretion and for

.233969.1
- 6 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
good cause shown, place the licensee on probation on the terms
and conditions it deems proper for protection of the public,
for the purpose of rehabilitation of the probationer or both.
Upon expiration of the term of probation, if a term is set,
further proceedings may be abated by the board if the holder of
the license furnishes the board with evidence that the licensee
is competent to practice, is of good moral character and has
complied with the terms of probation.
[C.] H. If evidence fails to establish to the
satisfaction of the board that the licensee is competent and is
of good moral character or if evidence shows that the licensee
has not complied with the terms of probation, the board may
revoke or suspend the license. If a license to practice in
this state is suspended, the holder of the license may not
practice during the term of suspension. A person whose license
has been revoked or suspended by the board and who thereafter
practices or attempts or offers to practice in New Mexico,
unless the period of suspension has expired or been modified by
the board or the license reinstated, is guilty of a felony and
shall be punished as provided in Section 61-6-20 NMSA 1978.
[D.] I. "Unprofessional or dishonorable conduct",

as used in this section, means, but is not limited to because 22
of enumeration, conduct of a licensee that includes the

following:

(1) procuring, aiding or abetting an illegal

.233969.1
- 7 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
procedure;
(2) employing a person to solicit patients for
the licensee;
(3) representing to a patient that a
manifestly incurable condition of sickness, disease or injury
can be cured;
(4) obtaining a fee by fraud or
misrepresentation;
(5) willfully or negligently divulging a
professional confidence;
(6) conviction of an offense punishable by
incarceration in a state penitentiary or federal prison or
conviction of a misdemeanor associated with the practice of the
licensee. A copy of the record of conviction, certified by the
clerk of the court entering the conviction, is conclusive
evidence;
(7) habitual or excessive use of intoxicants
or drugs;
(8) fraud or misrepresentation in applying for
or procuring a license to practice in this state or in
connection with applying for or procuring renewal, including
cheating on or attempting to subvert the licensing
examinations;

(9) making false or misleading statements

regarding the skill of the licensee or the efficacy or value of

.233969.1
- 8 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
the medicine, treatment or remedy prescribed or administered by
the licensee or at the direction of the licensee in the
treatment of a disease or other condition of the human body or
mind;
(10) impersonating another licensee,
permitting or allowing a person to use the license of the
licensee or practicing as a licensee under a false or assumed
name;
(11) aiding or abetting the practice of a
person not licensed by the board;
(12) gross negligence in the practice of a
licensee;
(13) manifest incapacity or incompetence to
practice as a licensee;
(14) discipline imposed on a licensee by
another licensing jurisdiction, including denial, probation,
suspension or revocation, based upon acts by the licensee
similar to acts described in this section. A certified copy of
the record of disciplinary action or sanction taken by another
jurisdiction is conclusive evidence of the action;
(15) the use of a false, fraudulent or

deceptive statement in a document connected with the practice 22
of a licensee;

(16) fee splitting;

(17) the prescribing, administering or

.233969.1
- 9 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
dispensing of narcotic, stimulant or hypnotic drugs for other
than accepted therapeutic purposes;
(18) conduct likely to deceive, defraud or
harm the public;
(19) repeated similar negligent acts or a
pattern of conduct otherwise described in this section or in
violation of a board rule;
(20) employing abusive billing practices;
(21) failure to report to the board any
adverse action taken against the licensee by:
(a) another licensing jurisdiction;
(b) a peer review body;
(c) a health care entity;
(d) a professional or medical society or
association;
(e) a governmental agency;
(f) a law enforcement agency; or
(g) a court for acts or conduct similar
to acts or conduct that would constitute grounds for action as
defined in this section;
(22) failure to report to the board the denial
of licensure, surrender of a license or other authorization to
practice in another state or jurisdiction or surrender of

membership on any medical staff or in any medical or

professional association or society following, in lieu of and

.233969.1
- 10 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
while under disciplinary investigation by any of those
authorities or bodies for acts or conduct similar to acts or
conduct that would constitute grounds for action as defined in
this section;
(23) failure to furnish the board, its
investigators or representatives with information requested by
the board;
(24) abandonment of patients;
(25) being found mentally incompetent or
insane by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(26) injudicious prescribing, administering or
dispensing of a drug or medicine;
(27) failure to adequately supervise, as
provided by board rule, a medical or surgical assistant or
technician or professional licensee who renders health care;
(28) sexual contact with a patient or person
who has authority to make medical decisions for a patient,
other than the spouse of the licensee;
(29) conduct unbecoming in a person licensed
to practice or detrimental to the best interests of the public;
(30) the surrender of a license or withdrawal

of an application for a license before another state licensing 22
board while an investigation or disciplinary action is pending

before that board for acts or conduct similar to acts or

conduct that would constitute grounds for action pursuant to

.233969.1
- 11 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
this section;
(31) sexual contact with a former mental
health patient of the licensee, other than the spouse of the
licensee, within one year from the end of treatment;
(32) sexual contact with a patient when the
licensee uses or exploits treatment, knowledge, emotions or
influence derived from the current or previous professional
relationship;
(33) improper management of medical records,
including failure to maintain timely, accurate, legible and
complete medical records;
(34) failure to provide pertinent and
necessary medical records to a physician or patient of the
physician in a timely manner when legally requested to do so by
the patient or by a legally designated representative of the
patient;
(35) undertreatment of pain as provided by
board rule;
(36) interaction with physicians, hospital
personnel, patients, family members or others that interferes
with patient care or could reasonably be expected to adversely
impact the quality of care rendered to a patient;
(37) soliciting or receiving compensation by a

physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant from a person

who is not an employer of the assistant;

.233969.1
- 12 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
(38) willfully or negligently divulging
privileged information or a professional secret; or
(39) the use of conversion therapy on a minor.
[E.] J. As used in this section:
(1) "conversion therapy" means any practice or
treatment that seeks to change a person's sexual orientation or
gender identity, including any effort to change behaviors or
gender expressions or to eliminate or reduce sexual or romantic
attractions or feelings toward persons of the same sex.
"Conversion therapy" does not mean:
(a) counseling or mental health services
that provide acceptance, support and understanding of a person
without seeking to change gender identity or sexual
orientation; or
(b) mental health services that
facilitate a person's coping, social support, sexual
orientation or gender identity exploration and development,
including an intervention to prevent or address unlawful
conduct or unsafe sexual practices, without seeking to change
gender identity or sexual orientation;
(2) "fee splitting" includes offering,

delivering, receiving or accepting any unearned rebate, 22
refunds, commission preference, patronage dividend, discount or

other unearned consideration, whether in the form of money or

otherwise, as compensation or inducement for referring

.233969.1
- 13 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
patients, clients or customers to a person, irrespective of any
membership, proprietary interest or co-ownership in or with a
person to whom the patients, clients or customers are referred;
(3) "gender identity" means a person's self-
perception, or perception of that person by another, of the
person's identity as a male or female based upon the person's
appearance, behavior or physical characteristics that are in
accord with or opposed to the person's physical anatomy,
chromosomal sex or sex at birth;
(4) "minor" means a person under eighteen
years of age; and
(5) "sexual orientation" means
heterosexuality, homosexuality or bisexuality, whether actual
or perceived.
[F.] K. Licensees whose licenses are in a
probationary status shall pay reasonable expenses for
maintaining probationary status, including laboratory costs
when laboratory testing of biological fluids is included as a
condition of probation."
SECTION 5. Section 61-6-16 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989,
Chapter 269, Section 12, as amended) is amended to read:
"61-6-16. REPORTING OF SETTLEMENTS AND JUDGMENTS,
PROFESSIONAL REVIEW ACTIONS AND ACCEPTANCE OF SURRENDERED
LICENSE--IMMUNITY FROM CIVIL DAMAGES--PENALTY.--
A. The board shall run a continuous query on the

.233969.1
- 14 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
_____/SB 270
national practitioner data bank with respect to each licensee
for whom the national practitioner data bank contains relevant
information.
[A.] B. All entities that make payments under a
policy of insurance, self-insurance or otherwise in settlement
or satisfaction of a judgment in a medical malpractice action
or claim, hospitals, health care entities and professional
review bodies shall report to the board all payments relating
to malpractice actions or claims arising in New Mexico that
involve a licensee and that are paid as a direct result of the
licensee's care, all appropriate professional review actions of
licensees and the acceptance or surrender of clinical
privileges by a licensee while under investigation or in lieu
of an investigation. For the purposes of this section, the
meaning of these terms shall be as contained in Section 431 of
the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42
USCA Section 11151.
[B.] C. The hospitals required to report under this
section, health care entities or professional review bodies
that provide such information in good faith shall not be
subject to suit for civil damages as a result of providing the

information. 22
[C.] D. A hospital, health care entity or

professional review body failing to comply with the reporting

requirements provided in this section shall be subject to civil

.233969.1
- 15 -

wen
=
lairetam
derocsrednu
eteled
=
]lairetam
detekcarb[
___/SB 270
penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000)."
- 16 -























.233969.1